California, session 20252026, AB1794.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 4059 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4059. (a) A person shall not furnish any dangerous drug, except upon the prescription of a physician, dentist, podiatrist, optometrist, veterinarian, or naturopathic doctor pursuant to Section 3640.7. A person shall not furnish any dangerous device, except upon the prescription of a physician, dentist, podiatrist, optometrist, veterinarian, or naturopathic doctor pursuant to Section 3640.7.(b) This section shall not apply to the furnishing of any dangerous drug or dangerous device by a manufacturer, wholesaler, or pharmacy to each other or to a physician, dentist, podiatrist, optometrist, veterinarian, or naturopathic doctor pursuant to Section 3640.7, or to a laboratory under sales and purchase records that correctly give the date, the names and addresses of the supplier and the buyer, the drug or device, and its quantity. This section shall not apply to the furnishing of any dangerous device by a manufacturer, wholesaler, or pharmacy to a physical therapist acting within the scope of their license under sales and purchase records that correctly provide the date the device is provided, the names and addresses of the supplier and the buyer, a description of the device, and the quantity supplied.(c) A pharmacist, or a person exempted pursuant to Section 4054, may distribute dangerous drugs and dangerous devices directly to dialysis patients pursuant to regulations adopted by the board. The board shall adopt any regulations as are necessary to ensure the safe distribution of these drugs and devices to dialysis patients without interruption thereof. A person who violates a regulation adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall be liable upon order of the board to surrender their personal license. These penalties shall be in addition to penalties that may be imposed pursuant to Section 4301. If the board finds any dialysis drugs or devices distributed pursuant to this subdivision to be ineffective or unsafe for the intended use, the board may institute immediate recall of any or all of the drugs or devices distributed to individual patients.(d) Home dialysis patients who receive any drugs or devices pursuant to subdivision (c) shall have completed a full course of home training given by a dialysis center licensed by the State Department of Public Health. The physician prescribing the dialysis products shall submit proof satisfactory to the manufacturer or wholesaler that the patient has completed the program.(e) A pharmacist may furnish a dangerous drug authorized for use pursuant to Section 2620.3 to a physical therapist. A record containing the date, name and address of the buyer, and name and quantity of the drug shall be maintained. This subdivision shall not be construed to authorize the furnishing of a controlled substance.(f) A pharmacist may furnish electroneuromyographic needle electrodes or hypodermic needles used for the purpose of placing wire electrodes for kinesiological electromyographic testing to physical therapists who are certified by the Physical Therapy Board of California to perform tissue penetration in accordance with Section 2620.5.(g) This section shall not be construed as permitting a licensed physical therapist to dispense or furnish a dangerous device without a prescription of a physician, dentist, podiatrist, optometrist, or veterinarian.(h) A veterinary food-animal drug retailer shall dispense, furnish, transfer, or sell veterinary food-animal drugs only to another veterinary food-animal drug retailer, a pharmacy, a veterinarian, or to a veterinarian’s client pursuant to a prescription from the veterinarian for food-producing animals.(i) (1) For purposes of this subdivision, “enteral nutrition supplements or replacements ” means medical food used as a therapeutic regimen to prevent serious disability or death in patients with medically diagnosed conditions that preclude the full use of regular food.(2) A pharmacist, manufacturer, or wholesaler may participate in an arrangement or agreement to deliver enteral nutrition supplements or replacements directly to a patient’s residence pursuant to a valid order from a prescriber acting within their scope of practice. practice, and in accordance with the services and activities provided by a pharmacist, consistent with the accepted standard of care pursuant to Sections 4051 and 4052.